District of Columbia statutes.
16-530

Time for trial of issues.

All issues raised by answers to the attachment, in any case, may be tried at the same time as the issues raised by the pleadings in the action, or separately, as may be just.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 551, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-530.
1973 Ed., § 16-530.